Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3802
Terms, defined.

As
used in sections 44-3801 to 44-3826, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Director shall mean the Director of Insurance;

(2) Department shall mean the Department of Insurance;

(3) Prepaid dental service plan or plan shall mean a contractual arrangement
to provide specified dental services, in consideration of a specified payment
for an interval of time, regardless of whether the payment for such services is made by the beneficiaries
individually or by a third person for them, in such a manner that the total
cost of such services is to be spread directly or indirectly among a group
of persons. A prepaid dental service plan includes arrangements that create
reasonable expectations of enforceable rights, but does not include the provision
of, or reimbursement for, dental services incidental to other insurance coverages;
and

(4) Prepaid dental service corporation shall mean a corporation organized
under sections 44-3801 to 44-3826 and offering a prepaid dental service plan
in this state.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB813, § 1.